Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.030

County road frontage owners' petition—Action on petition.

On the filing of the petition and bond and on being satisfied that the petition has been signed by petitioners residing in the vicinity of the county road or portion thereof, the board shall direct the county road engineer to report upon such vacation and abandonment.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.87.030. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 49, part; RRS s 6450-49, part.]